Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.25.030

Statement of organization by incidental committees. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1)(a) An incidental committee must file a statement of organization with the commission within two weeks after the date the committee first:

(i) Has the expectation of making any expenditures aggregating at least twenty-five thousand dollars in a calendar year in any election campaign, or to a political committee; and

(ii) Is required to disclose a payment received under RCW 29B.25.100(2)(d).

(b) If an incidental committee first meets the criteria requiring filing a statement of organization as specified in (a) of this subsection in the last three weeks before an election, then it must file the statement of organization within three business days.

(2) The statement of organization must include but is not limited to:

(a) The name, address, and electronic contact information of the committee;

(b) The names and addresses of all related or affiliated political or incidental committees or other persons, and the nature of the relationship or affiliation;

(c) The names, addresses, and titles of its officers; or if it has no officers, the names, addresses, and titles of its responsible leaders and the name of the person designated as the treasurer of the incidental committee;

(d) The name, office sought, and party affiliation of each candidate whom the committee is supporting or opposing if the committee contributes directly to a candidate and, if donating to a political committee, the name and address of that political committee;

(e) The ballot proposition concerned, if any, and whether the committee is in favor of or opposed to such proposition; and

(f) Such other information as the commission may by rule prescribe, in keeping with the policies and purposes of this title.

(3) Any material change in information previously submitted in a statement of organization must be reported to the commission within the 10 days following the change.

[ 2024 c 164 s 420; 2019 c 428 s 15; 2018 c 111 s 4. Formerly RCW 42.17A.207.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Finding—Effective date—2019 c 428: See notes following RCW 29B.20.110.

Effective date—2018 c 111: "This act takes effect January 1, 2019." [ 2018 c 111 s 10.]

Short title—2018 c 111: "This act may be known and cited as the democracy is strengthened by casting light on spending in elections act of 2018 or the Washington state DISCLOSE act of 2018." [ 2018 c 111 s 1.]

Findings—Intent—2018 c 111: "The legislature finds that the public has the right to know who is contributing to election campaigns in Washington state and that campaign finance disclosure deters corruption, increases public confidence in Washington state elections, and strengthens representative democracy.

The legislature finds that campaign finance disclosure is overwhelmingly supported by the citizens of Washington state as evidenced by the two initiatives that largely established Washington's current campaign finance system. Both passed with over seventy-two percent of the popular vote, as well as winning margins in every county in the state.

The legislature finds that nonprofit organizations are increasingly engaging in campaign activities in Washington state and across the country, including taking a more active role in contributing to candidate and ballot proposition campaigns. In some cases, these activities are occurring without adequate public disclosure due to loopholes in campaign finance regulations.

The legislature finds that many nonprofit organizations wish to use the provisions of current law to anonymously contribute to campaign activity, frustrating the purposes of public disclosure laws.

Therefore, the legislature intends to increase transparency and accountability, deter corruption, and strengthen confidence in the election process by closing campaign finance disclosure loopholes and requiring the disclosure of contributions and expenditures by nonprofit organizations that participate significantly in Washington state elections." [ 2018 c 111 s 2.]

Implementation with existing funds—2018 c 111: "The public disclosure commission shall implement the provisions of this act within existing funds." [ 2018 c 111 s 8.]